Maryland, session 2025, SB0856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
6–1702.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DAMPNESS” MEANS ABNORMAL MOISTURE IN THE INTERIOR OF
A FACILITY, INCLUDING:
(I) EXCESSIVE HUMIDITY LEVELS;
(II) LINGERING CONDENSATION;
(III) LEAKS;
(IV) WATER DAMAGE; AND
(V) MUSTY OR MOLDY ODORS.
(3) (I) “MOLD” MEANS A FORM OF MULTICELLULAR FUNGI THAT
LIVES:
1. ON PLANT OR ANIMAL MATTER; OR
2. IN AN INDOOR ENVIRONMENT.

SENATE BILL 856 3
(II) “MOLD” INCLUDES:
1. ALTERNARIA;
2. ASPERGILLUS;
3. CLADOSPORIUM;
4. FUSARIUM;
5. MEMNONIELLA;
6. MUCOR;
7. PENICILLIUM;
8. STACHYBOTRYS CHARTARUM; AND
9. TRICHODERMA.
(4) “MOLD REMEDIATION” MEANS:
(I) REMOVING, CLEANING, SANITIZING, DEMOLISHING, OR ANY
OTHER TREATMENT PERFORMED TO ADDRESS A MOLD HAZARD, MOLD, OR
DAMPNESS; OR
(II) ABATEMENT OF THE UNDERLYING CAUSE OF A MOLD
HAZARD, MOLD, OR DAMPNESS.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT, IN COORDINATION WITH THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, AND THE DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL SERVICES, SHALL DEVELOP AND UPDATE AS NECESSARY:
(1) A CENTRALIZED WEBSITE PROVIDING INFORMATION ABOUT
MOLD REMEDIATION AND DAMPNESS; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, AN
INFORMATIONAL PAMPHLET ON MOLD THAT INCLUDES:
(I) RESOURCES IN THE STATE RELATING TO MOLD; AND
(II) HOW TENANTS CAN CONTROL MOLD GROWTH IN THEIR
UNIT.

SENATE BILL 856
(C) INSTEAD OF DEVELOPING A PAMPHLET UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF
THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION AGENCY’S “BRIEF GUIDE TO MOLD, MOISTURE AND YOUR HOME”
PAMPHLET.
Article – Real Property
8–121. 8–220.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MOLD” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 6–1702 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “MOLD ASSESSMENT” MEANS:
(I) AN INSPECTION, AN INVESTIGATION, OR A SURVEY OF A
DWELLING OR OTHER STRUCTURE TO PROVIDE INFORMATION TO THE OWNER
REGARDING THE PRESENCE, IDENTIFICATION, OR EVALUATION OF MOLD;
(II) THE DEVELOPMENT OF A MOLD MANAGEMENT PLAN; OR
(III) THE COLLECTION OR ANALYSIS OF A MOLD SAMPLE.
(4) “MOLD REMEDIATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 6–1702 OF
THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(B) A LANDLORD SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE THE PAMPHLET DEVELOPED OR USED UNDER § 6–1702
OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE TO EACH TENANT IN A RENTAL UNIT ON THE
LANDLORD’S PROPERTY:
(I) AT THE TIME THE LEASE OR RENTAL AGREEMENT IS
SIGNED; AND
(II) EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER ON REQUEST BY A TENANT OF
THE RENTAL UNIT; AND
(2) REQUEST THAT A TENANT SIGN A STATEMENT ACKNOWLEDGING
RECEIPT OF THE PAMPHLET.

SENATE BILL 856 5
(C) (1) A LANDLORD SHALL PERFORM A MOLD ASSESSMENT AND MOLD
REMEDIATION WITHIN 45 DAYS WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN
NOTICE REGARDING THE DETECTION OF MOLD FROM:
(I) THE APPLICABLE LOCAL AGENCY ENFORCING HOUSING
AND LIVABILITY CODES; OR
(II) A TENANT OR BUILDING OCCUPANT.
(2) IF THE ASSESSMENT IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
DETECTS MOLD, A LANDLORD SHALL:
(I) PERFORM MOLD REMEDIATION WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER THE
ASSESSMENT IS COMPLETED; OR
(II) IF PERFORMING MOLD REMEDIATION WITHIN THE TIME
FRAME SPECIFIED IN ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS NOT FEASIBLE, WITHIN A
REASONABLE TIME AFTER THE ASSESSMENT IS COMPLETED.
(3) A LANDLORD SHALL ENSURE THAT THE MOLD ASSESSMENT AND
MOLD REMEDIATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) PARAGRAPHS (1) AND (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION FOLLOWS THE RECOMMENDED INDUSTRY GUIDELINES AND BEST
PRACTICES AND STATE AND LOCAL LAWS AND REGULATIONS.
(D) A LANDLORD SHALL:
(1) COMMUNICATE WITH OCCUPANTS DURING A MOLD ASSESSMENT
AND MOLD REMEDIATION UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION TO PROVIDE
UPDATES AND RELEVANT INFORMATION;
(2) ENSURE PROPER VENTILATION IN THE PROPERTY;
(3) ENSURE LOW INDOOR RELATIVE HUMIDITY IN THE PROPERTY;
AND
(4) MAINTAIN THE PROPERTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH ALL
APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL RESIDENTIAL HOUSING AND BUILDING
CODES, STANDARDS, REGULATIONS, RULES, AND REQUIREMENTS PERTAINING TO
MINIMUM LIVABILITY UNDER § 12–203 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(E) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A LOCAL GOVERNMENT
OR LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT TO CONDUCT A MOLD ASSESSMENT OR MOLD
REMEDIATION.

SENATE BILL 856
(2) IF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OWNS OR MANAGES A RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR LOCAL HOUSING AUTHORITY SHALL
COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION WITH RESPECT TO THE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Dampness” means abnormal moisture in the interior of a facility,
including:
(i) excessive humidity levels;
(ii) lingering condensation;
(iii) leaks;
(iv) water damage; and
(v) musty or moldy odors.
(3) (i) “Mold” means a form of multicellular fungi that lives:
1. on plant or animal matter; or
2. in an indoor environment.
(ii) “Mold” includes:
1. Alternaria;
2. Aspergillus;
3. Cladosporium;
4. Fusarium;
5. Memnoniella;
6. Mucor;
7. Penicillium;
8. Stachybotrys chartarum; and

SENATE BILL 856 7
9. Trichoderma.
(4) “Mold assessment” means:
(i) an inspection, an investigation, or a survey of a dwelling or other
structure to provide information to the owner regarding the presence, identification, or
evaluation of mold;
(ii) the development of a mold management plan; or
(iii) the collection or analysis of a mold sample.
(5) “Mold hazard” means an adverse human health effect associated with
mold exposure, including:
(i) allergic reactions;
(ii) asthma; and
(iii) any other respiratory complaints.
(6) “Mold remediation” means:
(i) removing, cleaning, sanitizing, demolishing, or any other
treatment performed to address a mold hazard, mold, or dampness; or
(ii) abatement of the underlying cause of a mold hazard, mold, or
dampness.
(b) On or before June 1, 2027, the Department of the Environment, in
consultation with the Maryland Department of Health, the Department of Housing and
Community Development, and the Department of General Services, shall adopt regulations
establishing uniform standards for mold assessment and mold remediation.
(c) The regulations adopted under this section shall:
(1) establish standards for:
(i) identifying and evaluating the presence of mold, including visible
mold inspection and testing;
(ii) mold air sample analyses in accordance with the standards of:
1. the Environmental Microbiology Laboratory Accreditation
Program at the American Industrial Hygiene Association;
2. the American Indoor Air Quality Council; or

SENATE BILL 856
3. any other nationally recognized accreditation entity that
operates independently of industry trade associations;
(iii) bulk or surface mold sample analyses conducted in accordance
with the standards of:
1. the American Industrial Hygiene Association;
2. the American Conference of Governmental Industrial
Hygienists; or
3. a similar nationally recognized professional organization;
(iv) visible mold inspections to assess the presence of any visible
water damage or dampness on surfaces, including ceiling tiles and gypsum wallboard;
(v) mold remediation in accordance with the U.S. Environmental
Protection Agency’s 2008 “Mold Remediation in Schools and Commercial Buildings”
guidelines as revised and updated; and
(vi) reinforcing building codes; and
(2) establish a risk reduction standard for mold hazards.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.